Wyoming, session 2025, HB0138.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-25-101, 11-25-104(a) and (b) and
11-25-201(d) are amended to read:

11-25-101. Wyoming gaming commission created;
composition; qualifications; personal or private interest;
salaries; officers; terms; vacancies; liaisons.
HB0138

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0052

(a) The Wyoming gaming commission is created. to be
composed of nine (9) persons who have resided in the state
for four (4) years and are qualified electors of Wyoming.
The commission shall consist of five (5) members appointed
by the governor, by and with the advice and consent of the
senate in accordance with W.S. 28-12-101 through 28-12-103.

(b) Each member of the commission shall have not less
than five (5) years of professional experience. At least
(1) member shall be an enrolled member of the Northern
Arapaho or Eastern Shoshone Indian tribe.

(c) Each member of the commission shall receive an
annual salary to be paid in equal monthly installments in
the same manner that other state salaries are paid.

(d) Biennially the members shall elect from among
their number a chairman and a deputy chairman who shall
serve in these offices for a period of two (2) years.

(e) Upon the expiration of the term of any member,
the member may be reappointed or a successor shall be
HB0138

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0052
appointed for a term of six (6) years, except in case of a
vacancy. Each member shall hold office until a successor is
appointed and qualified. The governor may remove any member
as provided in W.S. 9-1-202.

(f) Any vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the
governor in accordance with W.S. 28-12-101.

(g) Each member, within thirty (30) days after notice
of appointment and before commencement of the member's
duties, shall take, subscribe and file with the secretary
of state the oath of office prescribed by the constitution
of this state.

(h) No member of the commission or family member of a
member, as defined in W.S. 9-13-102(a)(v), shall own or
have any personal or private interest in any activity
regulated by the commission or in any animal participating
in a pari-mutuel event.

(j) One (1) senator appointed by the president of the
senate, one (1) representative appointed by the speaker of
the house and one (1) person appointed by the governor
HB0138

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0052
shall serve as ex officio nonvoting liaisons to the
commission. The legislative liaisons shall serve two (2)
year terms but are eligible for reappointment and may be
removed by the officer appointing the member. The
gubernatorial liaison shall serve for the term of office of
the governor and may be removed by the governor.
Legislative liaisons shall be paid salary, per diem and
mileage as provided in W.S. 28-5-101 when attending
meetings of the commission.

11-25-104. Gaming commission; director; employees;
meetings; quorum; records; licenses generally.

(a) The commission shall annually elect from its
membership a president and vice-president, and may employ a
director who has a working knowledge of pari-mutuel
betting, horse racing and other the forms of gaming
regulated by the commission to oversee the administrative
duties of the commission, or an executive secretary, or
both. The director may be retained on a yearly basis or for
the racing season only as determined by the commission.
Salary for the director or executive secretary shall be
determined by the commission with the consent of the
HB0138

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0052
personnel division. The commission may also is authorized
to employ other personnel required to carry out persons as
may be necessary to enable it to perform the duties imposed
upon it by this act and to designate the duties of
employees. The state shall provide the commission with
offices, equipment and facilities as may be necessary for
the performance of its duties.

(b) The commission shall hold an annual fall meeting
in Wyoming and shall hold special be subject to all of the
following:

(i) The commission shall hold meetings at such
times and places within Wyoming as the majority of the
members determine;.

(ii) A majority of the commission constitutes a
quorum and a majority vote of a quorum may act for the
commission;.

(iii) Any investigation, inquiry or hearing that
the commission has power to hold may be held by or before
any commissioner, or an employee of the commission acting
HB0138

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0052
in the capacity of a hearing officer, when an order
authorizing that action is entered in the records of the
commission, and any such investigation, inquiry or hearing
when approved and confirmed by the commission shall be the
investigation, inquiry or hearing of the commission. No
finding or order of the commission shall be effective
without the concurrence of a majority of the commission;

(iv) The secretary or director of the commission
shall keep a record of the proceedings of the commission
which is open at all times for public inspection;.

(v) Legislative liaisons shall be considered
members of the governing body of the commission for
purposes of attending executive sessions held pursuant to
W.S. 16-4-405(a) only.

11-25-201. Pari-mutuel permits; fees and reports;
disposition of funds; enforcement of provisions.

(d) All sums paid to the commission under this act
except contributions from permittees to the breeder award
fund, amounts paid under paragraphs (b)(iii) and (iv) of
HB0138

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0052
this section, fines and penalties shall be credited to the
pari-mutuel account which shall be used by the commission
for the payment of all expenses incurred in enforcing this
act. On a quarterly basis, the commission shall transfer
amounts within the account in excess of one million five
hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) to the state
treasurer for credit to the legislative stabilization
reserve account. All fines and penalties collected under
this act shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited
as provided in W.S. 8-1-109. The state treasurer shall pay
out of the account all warrants drawn by the state auditor,
upon vouchers issued and signed by the president,
vice-president chairman, vice chairman, director or
executive secretary of the commission. The commission shall
keep an accurate and true account of all funds received and
all vouchers issued by the commission. All funds received
and all vouchers issued by the commission shall be audited
at least biennially by the director of the state department
of audit or his designee and a copy of the audit shall be
delivered within thirty (30) days after completion to the
governor and the commission. The costs of the audit shall
be borne by the commission. The members of the commission
shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S.
HB0138

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0052
33-1-302(a)(vii), and compensation of fifty dollars
($50.00) for each day during which they are actually
engaged in the discharge of their duties. The total
expenses incurred by the commission shall not exceed the
total amount in the pari-mutuel account.

Section 2. W.S. 11-25-103 and 11-25-104(c) and (d)
are repealed.

Section 3.

(a) The president of the Wyoming gaming commission
and four (4) other members of the Wyoming gaming commission
designated by the governor on or before the effective date
of this act, or their successors in the event of a vacancy
or the expiration of a member's term, shall comprise the
Wyoming gaming commission until February 28, 2026.

(b) Except as provided for the members specified in
subsection (a) of this section, the terms of the Wyoming
gaming commission members appointed under W.S. 11-25-103
prior to the effective date of this act shall terminate on
the effective date of this act.
HB0138

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0052

(c) The governor shall submit appointments or
reappointments to the Wyoming gaming commission by the date
specified in W.S. 28-12-101(a)(ii) during the 2026 budget
session.

(d) Notwithstanding W.S. 11-25-101(e), as created in
section 1 of this act, the terms of appointments to the
Wyoming gaming commission specified by subsection (c) of
this section shall commence on March 1, 2026, with one (1)
of the appointments appointed to a term of two (2) years,
two (2) of the appointments appointed to a term of four (4)
years, and two (2) appointed to a term of six (6) years, as
designated by the governor.

Section 4. There is authorized five (5) full-time
positions for the members of the Wyoming gaming commission
under W.S. 11-25-101, as amended by section 1 of this act.
There is appropriated nine hundred sixty-five thousand
dollars ($965,000.00) from the pari-mutuel account to the
Wyoming gaming commission for purposes of providing
salaries and benefits to the members of the Wyoming gaming
commission under W.S. 11-25-101, as amended by section 1 of
HB0138

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0052
this act. This appropriation shall be for the period
beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2026. This appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2026. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
doubled and included in the Wyoming gaming commission's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.

Section 5. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0138